src/fst/morphology/stems/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON ateq
AaB Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Aarup Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Access Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Aeroflot Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Aggesen Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Ahrenberg Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Akra Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Aleksandersen Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Alsberg Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Amondsen Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Andreasen Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Aquinas Zateq_oqsZmorf ; !Ikke godkendt som fornavn
Arentzen Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Aronsen Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Asmussen Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Oqaatsit% Minutsimut Zateq_oqsZmorf ; !titel på radioudsendelse
Aviannguaq Z1nnguaq_ateqZmorf ;
Aznavour Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
BUPL Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Bag% Guldkystens% Brænding Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Balsholm Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Barfod Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Bartók Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Bayer Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Behrend Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Bengtsson Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Berger Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Bernikow Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Bidstrup Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Birch Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Bjerregård Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Bladt Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Bluth Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Boehringer Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Bollerup Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Borch Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Borup Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Brandauer Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Breindal Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Broberg Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Brun Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Bukdahl Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Bøjler Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Callesen Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Cederholm Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Citroen Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Couperin Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
DDGU Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
DMU Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
DR1 Zateq_numCZmorf ;
DR2 Zateq_numVZmorf ;
Dahlerup Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Danflex Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Dansk% Islamisk% Begravelsesfond Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Delors Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Dittmer Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Duus Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
ESS-Food Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Ejlersen Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Endresen Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Erlander Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Expressen Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Farrow Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Fink Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Fonvig Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Freuchen Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Færgemann Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Geertsen Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Glindemann Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Goul Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Grillich Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Gudiksen Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Gørrisen Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Hagenlund Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Hammond Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Hausmann Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Heimburger Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Henriques Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Hiort Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Holch Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Hornbak Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Hvidbjerg Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Højriis Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
ISDN Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Intel Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Itilliannguaq Z1nnguaq_ateqZmorf ;
Itsinnguaq Z1nnguaq_ateqZmorf ;
Jakobsen Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Jessen Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Juell Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
KTO Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Kaalannguaq Z1nnguaq_ateqZmorf ;
Kejser Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Kiær Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Klingenberg Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Kolbrun Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Kresten Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Kusk Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Landis_&_Gyr Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Lawaetz Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Lindberg Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Lommer Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Lydal Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Maagensen Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Malersorninnguaq Z1nnguaq_ateqZmorf ;
MapPoint Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Maximut Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Melleris Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Mikkelsen Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
MotoCross Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Møller:Møller Zateq_oqsZmorf ; !også efternavn
Nagdlúnguaĸ Z1nnguaq_ateqZmorf ;
Nagel Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Newman Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Nordgrønlands_Videnhus Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Nykredit Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Observer Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Olufsen Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
PET Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Paviasen Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Piaget Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Pikiulinnguaq Z1nnguaq_ateqZmorf ;
Poppel Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Puggaard Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Radiofonien Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Refsgaard Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Riel Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Rosbach Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Rudyard Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
SJ Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Sandermosen Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Scheel Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Schneevoigt Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Schønberg Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Severinsen Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Siumut Z2-ateq_specielSZmorf ; !går til eget katalog
Sixten Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Skæg Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Sommerfelt Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Statsminister Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Stiansen Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Støt% fangerne Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Sydow Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Tanbreez Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Terkelsen Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Tholstrup Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Thyrring Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Torbjørnsen Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Tujdman Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
UNHCR Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Uttenthal Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Vestas Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Visscher Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Walt Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Wejlebjerg Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Wienkongressen Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Wivel Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Wright Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
akkad Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Østerberg Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Peugeot% 2%06    Zateq_numCZmorf ;
Peugeot% 2%08    Zateq_numVZmorf ;
VISKA% horses Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
